Arkansas, session 2025, HB1879.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 25-19-106(d), as amended by Acts 2025, No.
179, concerning public meetings under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967,
is amended to read as follows:
(d)(1) All Except as provided under subdivision (d)(6) of this
section, all officially scheduled, special, and called open public meetings
shall be recorded in a manner that allows for the capture of sound, including
without limitation:
(A) A sound-only recording;
(B) A video recording with sound and picture; or
(C) A digital or analog broadcast capable of being
recorded.
*LGL177*
04-03-2025 11:06:09 LGL177

As Engrossed: H4/3/25 HB1879
(2) A recording of an open public meeting shall be maintained by
a public entity for a minimum of one (1) year from the date of the open
public meeting.
(3) The recording shall be maintained in a format that may be
reproduced upon a request under this chapter.
(4) Subdivisions (d)(1) and (2) of this section do not apply to:
(A) Executive sessions; or
(B) Volunteer fire departments.
(5)(A) All officially scheduled, special, and called open public
meetings of a city council or a county quorum court shall be recorded as a
video recording.
(B) A video recording under subdivision (d)(5)(A) of this
section shall be posted on the website of the city council or county quorum
court no later than twenty-four (24) hours after the public meeting.
(C) If a city council or county quorum court does not have
a website, the city council or county quorum court shall post the video
recording of an open public meeting to a social media account created and
maintained by the city council or the county quorum court no later than
twenty-four (24) hours after the public meeting.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Compliance.
All city councils and county quorum courts shall comply with the
provisions of this act on or before one (1) year following the effective date
of this act.

/s/Lundstrum










04-03-2025 11:06:09 LGL177